trnsducers/chv.twol
Alphabet																
  а ӑ е ё ӗ и о у ӳ ы э ю я б в г д ж з к л м н п р с ҫ т ф х ц ч ш щ й ь ъ																
  А Ӑ Е Ё Ӗ И О У Ӳ Ы Э Ю Я Б В Г Д Ж З К Л М Н П Р С Ҫ Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Й Ь Ъ																
 %{A%}:а %{A%}:е																
 %{Ă%}:ӑ %{Ă%}:ӗ %{Ă%}:0																
 %{м%}:м %{м%}:0 %{м%}:н																
 %{н%}:н %{н%}:0																
 %{р%}:р %{р%}:т %{р%}:ч																
 %{ъ%}:0																
 %{ь%}:0																
 %{я%}:0 %{я%}:йӑ %{я%}:йӗ																
 %{э%}:ӑ %{э%}:ӗ %{э%}:0																
 %{У%}:у %{У%}:ю %{У%}:ӳ																
 %{С%}:0																
 %{Н%}:н %{Н%}:0																
 %{Е%}:ӗ %{Е%}:и																
 %{Х%}:ӗв  %{Х%}:ӑв  %{Х%}:0
;																
																
																
Sets																
																
BackVow = ӑ а ы о у я ё ю ;																
																
FrontVow = е ӗ э и ӳ ;																
																
Vow = ӑ а ы о у я ё ю е ӗ э и ӳ ;																
																
ArchiBack = %{ъ%} ;																
																
Cns = б в г д ж з к л м н п р с ҫ т ф х ц ч ш щ й ъ ;																
																
ArchiCns = %{м%} %{н%} %{р%}  %{С%} ;																
																
																
																
Rules																
																
"Remove morpheme boundary"																
%>:0 <=> _ ;																
																
"Back vowel harmony for archiphoneme {A}"																
%{A%}:а <=> [ BackVow: | ArchiBack: ] [ ArchiCns: | Cns: | %{э%}: | %{я%}: | %{ь%}: | %{Ă%}: | %{У%}: %{Н%}: | %>: ]+ _ ;																
																
																
"Back vowel harmony for archiphoneme {Ă}"																
%{Ă%}:ӑ <=> [ BackVow: | ArchiBack: ] [ ArchiCns: | Cns: | %{э%}: | %{я%}: | %{ь%}: | %{Ă%}: | %{У%}: %{Н%}: | %>: ]+ _ ;																
        except																
				[ %{м%}: | BackVow: | FrontVow: | %{э%}: | %{я%}: | %{ь%}: | %{У%}: %{Н%}: ] %>: _ [ н | м | р ] ;												
																
																
"No surface {Ă} in plural genetive  or after a vowel in stem"																
%{Ă%}:0 <=> [ BackVow: | FrontVow: | %{м%}: | %{я%}: | %{э%}: | и й: | %{Н%}: ] [ %{ь%}: ]* %>: _ [ н | м | р ];																
	except															
		и: [ й: ]* %>: _ м ; !Possessive for шаши, информаци														
																
																
																
"No surface {м} in plural genetive and dative"																
%{м%}:0 <=> _ %>: [ %{н%}: | %{Ă%}: н ] ;																
																
"Surface {м} as н in plural locative and ablative"																
%{м%}:н <=> _ %>: %{р%}: %{A%}: ;																
																
"Surface {р} as т after and  in locative and ablative px2sg"																
 %{р%}:т <=> р %>: _ %{A%}: ;																
		%{У%}: %{Н%}: %>: _ ;														
																
"Remove duplicate consonant in cases"																
Cons:0 <=> Cons _ %>: ;																
!	except															
!			й _ %>: %{У%}: ;													
	where Cons in Cns ;															
																
																
																
"ьӑ"																
я:ьӑ <=> _  %{ь%}: %>: ;																
	except															
		_ %{ь%}: %>: %{У%}: ; !Женя														
																
"Remove ь before vowel in affix or remove duplicate ь"																
ь:0 <=> _ я: %{ь%}: %>: ; ! Наталья																
	_ %>: [ %{Ă%}: | %{A%}: | %{У%}: ] ;															
	_ е: %{я%}: %>: ; ! платье															
	except															
		_ я: %{ь%}: %>: %{У%}: ;														
																
"Remove vowel in stem before affix"																
V:0 <=> _ [ %{э%}: | %{я%}: ] %>: ;																
	    _ %>: [ %{У%}: | %{Е%}: | %{Ă%}: р ];															
	    _ %{я%}: %>: %{У%}: ;															
		_ %{ь%}: %>: %{У%}: ; !Женя														
	_ [ %{Х%}:ӗв | %{Х%}:ӑв ] ; 
	except															
		_  %{я%}:0 %>: ;														
		_ %{я%}: %>: %{У%}: ;														
	where V in Vow ;															
																
																
"No surface {я} in nominative and px1sg after е"																
%{я%}:0 <=> _ #;																
		_ %>: %{У%}: ;														
!	   е: _ %>: %{Ă%}: м ;  !платье															
																
"Back vowel harmony for archiphoneme {я}"																
%{я%}:йӑ <=> BackVow: _ %>: ;																
	except															
		 _ %>: %{У%}: ;														
																
																
"No surface {э} in nominative"																
%{э%}:0 <=> _ # ;																
		_ %>:[ %{У%}: | %{Е%}: ] ;														
																
"Back vowel harmony for archiphoneme {э}"																
%{э%}:ӑ <=> BackVow: _ %>: ;																
	except															
		 _ %>:[ %{У%}: | %{Е%}: ];														
																
"Duplicate consonants in 1-2 syllables in genetive and px1sg/px3sp"																
%{С%}:C <=> C _ [ Vow: ]* %>: [ %{Ă%}: | %{A%}: | %{У%}: | %{Е%}: ] ; where C in Cns ;																
																
"Remove surface {н} in affix after a consonant"	!Dative															
%{н%}:0 <=> C: %>: _  ;																
			where C in Cns ;													
																
"Remove surface {й} at the end of the stem after и"																
!Золотницкий																
й:0 <=> и _ %>: ;																
	!	_ %>: %{У%}: ;														
	except															
		и _ %>: %{Ă%}: м ; !px1sg														
		и _ %>: %{У%}: ;														
																
"Add й after и in Possessive 1sg"																
и:ий <=> _ %>: %{Ă%}: м ;																
		! _ %>: %{У%}: ;														
																
"Surface {ч} in dative plural and px3sp abl/loc"																
%{р%}:ч <=> %{м%}: %>: _ ;																
	    %{Е%}: %{Н%}: %>: _ ;															
																
"No surface ҫ in nominative"																
!власть																
ҫ:сть <=> _ # ;																
																
																
"Back vowel а, ӑ, о  harmony for archiphoneme {У}"																
%{У%}:у <=> [ а: | ӑ: | о: ] [ Cns: | ArchiCns: | %{э%}: | %>: ]+ _ ;																
	except															
		[ а: | ӑ: | о: ] й: %>: _ ;														
																
"Back vowel я and й  harmony for archiphoneme {У}"																
%{У%}:ю <=>  [ я: | ArchiBack: ] [ %{я%}: | %{ь%}: ]* %>: _ ;																
	    [ а: | ӑ: | о: ] й: %>: _ ;															
																
"{н} in abl/loc affix in px2sg and px3sp"																
 %{Н%}:н <=> [ %{У%}: | %{Е%}: ] _ %>: %{р%}: ;																
																
"Surface {E} as [e] in px3sp"																
%{Е%}:ӗ <=> C: %>: _ ;																
		where C in Cns ;														
																
																
"Back vowel harmony for archiphoneme {Х}"
%{Х%}:ӑв <=> BackVow: _ %>: ;
        except
                _ %>: [ %{р%}: | ш | п | с ] ;
       

"No surface {Х} in nom, loc, abl, ter, ins"
%{Х%}:0 <=> _ # ;
		_ %>: [ %{р%}: | ш | п | с ] ;
